Washington statutes.
RCW 22.09.466

Grain indemnity fund program—Debt and obligation of grain dealer or warehouse operator—Recovery by director.

Amounts paid from the grain indemnity fund in satisfaction of any approved claim shall constitute a debt and obligation of the grain dealer or warehouse operator against whom the claim was made. On behalf of the grain indemnity fund, the director may bring suit, file a claim, or intervene in any legal proceeding to recover from the grain dealer or warehouse operator the amount of the payment made from the grain indemnity fund, together with costs and attorneys' fees incurred. In instances where the superior court is the appropriate forum for a recovery action, the director may elect to institute the action in the superior court of Thurston county.

[ 2011 c 336 s 634; 1987 c 509 s 19.]

NOTES:

Severability—1987 c 509: See note following RCW 22.09.060.